src/scripts/Esperanto/gpos.foma
# SPDX-License-Identifier: GPL-3.0-or-later

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see
# <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define La la ; 

define Determiner 
ia | iaj | ian | iajn | 
iom | 
iu | iuj | iun | iujn | 
kelka | kelkaj | kelkan | kelkajn | 
nenia | neniaj | nenian | neniajn | 
tia | tiaj | tian | tiajn | 
ties | 
tiu | tiuj | tiun | tiujn | 
ĉia | ĉiaj | ĉian | ĉiajn | 
ĉiu | ĉiuj | ĉiun | ĉiujn ; 

define PossessivePronoun 
cia | ciaj | cian | ciajn | 
ilia | iliaj | ilian | iliajn | 
lia | liaj | lian | liajn | 
mia | miaj | mian | miajn | 
nia | niaj | nian | niajn | 
onia | oniaj | onian | oniajn | 
sia | siaj | sian | siajn | 
via | viaj | vian | viajn | 
ĝia | ĝiaj | ĝian | ĝiajn | 
ŝia | ŝiaj | ŝian | ŝiajn ; 

define ToBe 
esti | estas | estis | estos | estus | estu ; 

define Conjunction 
aŭ | kaj | kaŭ | ke | kvankam | kvazaŭ | nek | ol | se | sed | tial | ĉar ; 

define Particle 
ajn | des | for | jen | ju | mem | ne | ĉi | ĉu ; 

define Preposition 
al | anstataŭ | antaŭ | apud | 
cis | cit | 
da | de | disde | dum | 
ekde | ekster | el | en | 
far | 
graŭ | 
inter | 
je | 
kontraŭ | krom | kun | 
laŭ | 
malantaŭ | malgraŭ | 
na | 
per | po | por | post | preter | pri | pro | 
samkiel | sen | sob | sub | super | sur | 
tra | trans | tutĉirkaŭ | 
ĉe | ĉirkaŭ | 
ĝis ; 

define Interogative 
kia | kiaj | kian | kiajn | 
kie | kien | 
kial | 
kiel |
kiom | 
kiam | 
kies | 
kio | kioj | kion | kiojn | 
kiu | kiuj | kiun | kiujn ; 

define PersonalPronoun 
ci | cin | 
ili | ilin | 
li | lin | 
mi | min | 
ni | nin | 
oni | onin | 
vi | vin | 
ĝi | ĝin | 
ŝi | ŝin ; 

define FunctionWord La | Determiner | ToBe | Conjunction | Particle | Preposition | Interogative | PersonalPronoun | PossessivePronoun ; 

regex 
La -> la || _ ,, 
Determiner -> det || _ ,, 
ToBe -> be || _ ,, 
Conjunction -> conj || _ ,, 
Particle -> part || _ ,, 
Preposition -> prep || _ ,, 
Interogative -> int || _ ,, 
PersonalPronoun -> pers || _ ,, 
PossessivePronoun -> pos || _ ,, 
\FunctionWord -> content || _ ;
